Hawaii, session 2026, SB2519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 139-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  No person may be appointed or employed as a law enforcement officer after June 30, [2026,] 2028, unless the person: (1)  Has satisfactorily completed a basic program of law enforcement training approved by the board; (2)  Has received training designed to minimize the use of excessive force, including legal standards, de‑escalation techniques, crisis intervention tactics, mental health response, implicit bias, and first aid; and (3)  Possesses other qualifications as prescribed by the board for the employment of law enforcement officers, including minimum age, education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, good conduct, moral character, and experience. (b)  Beginning on July 1, [2026,] 2028, the board shall issue a certification to an applicant or law enforcement officer who meets the requirements of subsection (a) or who has satisfactorily completed a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction that the board deems to be equivalent in content and quality to the requirements of subsection (a)." SECTION 2.  Section 139-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement officer by any county police department, the department of law enforcement, the department of land and natural resources, the department of taxation, or the department of the attorney general after June 30, [2026,] 2028, unless the person possesses a valid certification issued by the board pursuant to section 139-6(b)." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request